New Jersey, session 222, A2496.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Section 3 of P.L.2004 c.48 (C.52:17C-19) is amended to read as follows: 3.    a. There is established in the Department of the Treasury within the General Fund a special account to be known as the "9-1-1 System and Emergency Response Trust Fund Account." b.    Funds credited to the "9-1-1 System and Emergency Response Trust Fund Account" shall be annually appropriated for the purposes of paying: (1)  eligible costs pursuant to the provisions of sections 13 and 14 of P.L.1989, c.3 (C.52:17C-13 and 52:17C-14); (2)  the costs of funding the State's capital equipment (including debt service), facilities and operating expenses that arise from emergency response; (3)  the cost of emergency response training, including any related costs or expenses of the Office of Emergency Management in the Division of State Police in the Department of Law and Public Safety; (4)  the cost of operating the Office of Emergency Telecommunications Services created pursuant to section 3 of P.L.1989, c.3 (C.52:17C-3); (5)  the cost of operating the Statewide Public Safety Communications Commission created pursuant to section 5 of P.L.2011, c.4 (C.52:17C-3.2); (6)  any costs associated with implementing any requirement of the Federal Communications Commission concerning 9-1-1 service that is not otherwise allocated to a carrier and not eligible for reimbursement under law or regulation; (7)  any costs associated with planning, designing or implementing an automatic location identification technology that is not otherwise allocated to a wireless carrier and not eligible for reimbursement under law or regulation; [and] (8)  any costs associated with planning, designing or acquiring replacement equipment or systems (including debt service) related to the enhanced 9-1-1 network as defined by subsection e. of section 1 of P.L.1989, c.3 (C.52:17C-1) ; and (9)  any costs incurred by counties and municipalities for the provision and maintenance of 9-1-1 emergency services including, but not limited to, costs associated with emergency response training, operating expenses, and capital expenses. c.    The Attorney General shall promulgate rules and regulations necessary to allocate 9-1-1 System and Emergency Response Trust Fund Account monies to county, regional, and municipal public safety answering points.  Funds shall be prioritized for distribution to county, regionalized, or large centralized public safety answering points.  To the extent available, funds shall then be distributed to other local public safety answering points. (cf: P.L.2013, c.245, s.1) 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.